Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201676-2207.03
Certified general real property appraiser, defined.

Certified general real property appraiser means a person who holds a valid credential as a certified general real property appraiser issued under the Real Property Appraiser Act.

Laws 1990, LB 1153, § 10;

Laws 1991, LB 203, § 13;

Laws 1994, LB 1107, § 10;

Laws 2006, LB 778, § 23;

Laws 2007, LB186, § 1;

R.S.1943, (2009), § 76-2210;

Laws 2015, LB139, § 11.